Utah statutes.
53A-11a-302.   Model policy.

On or before September 1, 2008, the State Board of Education shall:

(1)  develop a model policy on bullying, hazing, and retaliation, consistent with Section 53A-11a-301, in order to assist a school board in adopting a policy under Section 53A-11a-301; and

(2)  post the model policy described in Subsection (1) on the State Board of Education's website.

